Utah statutes.
26-38-8.   Penalties.

(1)  A first violation of Section 26-38-3 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $100.

(2)  Any second or subsequent violation of Section 26-38-3 is subject to a civil penalty of not less than $100 and not more than $500.



Amended by Chapter 218, 2010 General Session

